Maine, session 132, LD605.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to eliminate provisions of law that impede innovative solutions to
solid waste disposal and support alternative methods of solid waste disposal, such as reuse
and recycling, to reduce volumes in landfills and provide solutions for sustainable
management of municipal solid waste.
Page 1 - 132LR0007(01)